Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-241
Cemeteries; acquisition; control.

A city of the first class may purchase, hold, and pay for, in the manner herein provided, lands for the purpose of the burial of the dead, and all necessary grounds for hospital grounds and waterworks, and have and exercise police jurisdiction over the same, and over any cemetery lying near said city and used by the inhabitants thereof.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XLVII, p. 258;

R.S.1913, § 4857;

C.S.1922, § 4025;

C.S.1929, § 16-242;

R.S.1943, § 16-241;

Laws 1973, LB 276, § 1.

For additional provisions relating to cemeteries, see Chapter 12.